Utah statutes.
4-19-2.   Department authorized to approve and make grants and loans,
acquire property, or lease or operate property.
The department, in conjunction with the administration of the rural
rehabilitation program, may:
(1)  approve and make a loan to a farm or agricultural cooperative association
regulated under Title 3, Uniform Agricultural Cooperative Association Act,
subject to Section 4-19-3, including:
(a)  taking security for the loan through a mortgage, trust deed, pledge, or
other security device;
(b)  purchasing a promissory note, real estate contract, mortgage, trust deed,
or other instrument or evidence of indebtedness; and
(c)  collecting, compromising, canceling, or adjusting a claim or obligation
arising out of the administration of the rural rehabilitation program;
(2)  purchase or otherwise obtain property in which the department has
acquired an interest on account of a mortgage, trust deed, lien, pledge,
assignment, judgment, or other means at any execution or foreclosure sale;
(3)  operate or lease, if necessary to protect its investment, property in
which it has an interest or sell or otherwise dispose of the property; and
(4)  approve and make an education loan or an education grant to an individual
for the purpose of attending a vocational school, college, or university to
obtain additional education, qualifications, or skills.
